Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-98] Housing loan programs; general
powers. (a) The corporation may make, enter into, and enforce all
contracts or agreements that are necessary, convenient, or desirable in the
performance of its duties in executing the housing loan programs.

(b) The corporation may require
representations and warranties as it determines necessary to secure its loans.
[L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next